Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2805
Manufacturing operation; eligibility; repay grant funds.

(1) The department shall not approve an application for a manufacturing modernization investment project that was commenced prior to the date of the application.

(2) Any eligible manufacturing operation that no longer meets the requirements of subdivision (2) of section 48-2803 shall repay any grant funds received under the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB265, § 5.